Washington statutes.
RCW 43.19.450

Supervisor of engineering and architecture—Qualifications—Appointment—Powers and duties—Delegation of authority—"State facilities" defined.

The director shall appoint a supervisor of engineering and architecture.

A person is not eligible for appointment as supervisor of engineering and architecture unless he or she is licensed to practice the profession of engineering or the profession of architecture in the state of Washington and for the last five years prior to his or her appointment has been licensed to practice the profession of engineering or the profession of architecture.

As used in this section, "state facilities" includes all state buildings, related structures, and appurtenances constructed for any elected state officials, institutions, departments, boards, commissions, colleges, community colleges, except the state universities, The Evergreen State College and regional universities. "State facilities" does not include facilities owned by or used for operational purposes and constructed for the department of transportation, department of fish and wildlife, department of natural resources, or state parks and recreation commission.

The director or the director's designee shall:

(1) Prepare cost estimates and technical information to accompany the capital budget and prepare or contract for plans and specifications for new construction and major repairs and alterations to state facilities.

(2) Contract for professional architectural, engineering, and related services for the design of new state facilities and major repair or alterations to existing state facilities.

(3) Provide contract administration for new construction and the repair and alteration of existing state facilities.

(4) In accordance with the public works laws, contract on behalf of the state for the new construction and major repair or alteration of state facilities.

The director may delegate any and all of the functions under subsections (1) through (4) of this section to any agency upon such terms and conditions as considered advisable.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 222; 1994 c 264 s 15; 1988 c 36 s 14; 1982 c 98 s 3; 1981 c 136 s 63; 1979 c 141 s 45; 1965 c 8 s 43.19.450. Prior: 1959 c 301 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Effective date—1981 c 136: See RCW 72.09.900.